Maryland, session 2025, HB1467.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Local Government
21–201.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “District” means a taxing and assessment district.
(c) “District council” means the governing body of a county acting as the district
council for a district created under this subtitle.
(d) “Project” means an erosion prevention project or erosion control project.
– 1 –

Ch. 168 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
21–202.
This subtitle supplements the provisions of the Natural Resources Article relating to
shore erosion control projects.
21–203.
The purpose of projects constructed under this subtitle is to prevent erosion of land
by any body of water in the State.
21–204.
(a) Each recorded subdivision that abuts a body of water in the State is a district.
(b) Each district established under this section shall be named for the subdivision
from which the district is created.
21–205.
(a) The governing body of a county is the district council for each district in the
county.
(b) A district council shall:
(1) keep a separate record of its proceedings for each district; and
(2) deposit all money received for each district to the credit of that district.
(c) (1) The district council shall:
(I) require the depository of money under subsection (b)(2) of this
section to give the same security for the repayment of money deposited; and
(II) pay the same interest on the money as is required for the deposit
of county funds.
(2) ANY INTEREST EARNINGS ON MONEY DEPOSITED FOR A DISTRICT
SHALL BE CREDITED TO THAT DISTRICT.
21–206.
(A) (1) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO:
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 168
(I) THE DEVELOPMENT AND COMPLETION OF PLANS AND
SPECIFICATIONS FOR THE CONSTRUCTION OF A PROJECT IN A DISTRICT IN ANNE
ARUNDEL COUNTY;
(II) THE PERMITTING ACTIVITIES ASSOCIATED WITH THE
PROJECT IN ANNE ARUNDEL COUNTY; OR
(III) THE PREPARATION OF A COST ESTIMATE FOR THE PROJECT
IN ANNE ARUNDEL COUNTY; OR
(IV) THE CONSTRUCTION OF A PROJECT IN A DISTRICT IN ANNE
ARUNDEL COUNTY.
(2) THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED AS LIMITING OR
RESTRICTING A DISTRICT FROM ACCESSING ANY MONEY KEPT FOR THE BENEFIT OF
THE DISTRICT TO PAY FOR AN ACTIVITY IDENTIFIED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION.
(B) The district council may construct a project in a district if requested by a
petition signed by at least 75% of the real property owners in the district.
(C) (1) THE ENTITY ADMINISTERING A SHORE EROSION CONTROL
DISTRICT MAY USE TAX FUNDS FOR THE MAINTENANCE, REPAIR, OR RESTORATION
OF AN EXISTING PROJECT WITHOUT A PETITION.
(2) THE ENTITY ADMINISTERING A SHORE EROSION CONTROL
DISTRICT SHALL CONDUCT A PUBLIC HEARING BEFORE USING TAX FUNDS FOR THE
MAINTENANCE, REPAIR, OR RESTORATION OF AN EXISTING PROJECT.
(3) THIS SUBSECTION APPLIES TO ANY EXISTING SHORELINE
EROSION CONTROL PROJECT WITHIN THE DISTRICT, REGARDLESS OF THE INITIAL
SOURCE OF FUNDING.
21–207.
(A) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO ANNE ARUNDEL COUNTY.
(a) (B) (1) When the plans and specifications for the construction of a
project in a district are complete, the district council shall notify each owner of real property
in the district:
(i) that the plans and specifications for the construction of the
project are complete and can be inspected at the office of the governing body of the county;
– 3 –

Ch. 168 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) of the probable cost of the project; and
(iii) of the date and place of a hearing on the petition.
(2) The notice shall be:
(i) mailed to the last known address of each property owner in the
district; and
(ii) published once each week for 2 successive weeks in a newspaper
of general circulation in the county.
(b) (C) After holding a hearing, the district council shall decide whether to
proceed with the project.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025 is an emergency measure, is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
health or safety, has been passed by a yea and nay vote supported by three–fifths of all the
members elected to each of the two Houses of the General Assembly, and shall take effect
from the date it is enacted.
Approved by the Governor, April 22, 2025.
– 4 –